Washington statutes.
RCW 41.34.020

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated:

(1) "Actuary" means the state actuary or the office of the state actuary.

(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3)(a) "Compensation" for teachers for purposes of this chapter is the same as "earnable compensation" for plan 3 in chapter 41.32 RCW except that the compensation may be reported when paid, rather than when earned.

(b) "Compensation" for classified employees for purposes of this chapter is the same as "compensation earnable" for plan 3 in RCW 41.35.010, except that the compensation may be reported when paid, rather than when earned.

(c) "Compensation" for public employees for purposes of this chapter is the same as "compensation earnable" for plan 3 in RCW 41.40.010, except that the compensation may be reported when paid, rather than when earned.

(4)(a) "Employer" for teachers for purposes of this chapter means the same as "employer" for plan 3 in chapter 41.32 RCW.

(b) "Employer" for classified employees for purposes of this chapter means the same as "employer" for plan 3 in RCW 41.35.010.

(c) "Employer" for public employees for purposes of this chapter means the same as "employer" for plan 3 in RCW 41.40.010.

(5) "Member" means any employee included in the membership of a retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.32 RCW of plan 3, chapter 41.35 RCW of plan 3, or chapter 41.40 RCW of plan 3.

(6) "Member account" or "member's account" means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member.

(7) "Retiree" means any member in receipt of an allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by such member.

(8) "Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in *RCW 41.32.010(29).

(9) "Classified employee" means a member of the school employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(10) "Public employee" means a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 31; 2000 c 247 s 401; 1998 c 341 s 301; 1996 c 39 s 13; 1995 c 239 s 202.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.32.010 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (29) to subsection (49).

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Effective dates—1996 c 39: See note following RCW 41.32.010.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.